Alaska, session 34, SB209.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section 05 to read: 06 LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the legislature to ensure all students who 07 graduate from high schools in the state have achieved proficiency in the classes and subject 08 areas required for graduation. 09 * Sec. 2. AS 14.03.075(e) is amended to read: 10 (e) In this section, 11 (1) "school district" has the meaning given in AS 14.30.350; 12 (2) "social studies" includes civics, the history of the United States 13 of America, and state history. 14 * Sec. 3. AS 14.03.075 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 01 (f) The department shall adopt performance standards for students in grades 02 eight, 10, and 12 in economics, science, and social studies. The performance standards 03 adopted for grades 10 and 12 must correspond with state high school graduation 04 requirements. 05 (g) The department shall develop proficiency confirmation tools for students 06 in grades eight, 10, and 12 that evaluate a student's level of proficiency in economics, 07 language arts, mathematics, science, and social studies according to the performance 08 standards adopted for grades eight, 10, and 12, respectively. 09 (h) A school district shall administer the proficiency confirmation tools to 10 students in grades eight, 10, and 12. 11 (i) A school district shall affix a seal of certified proficiency to the high school 12 diploma of a student who meets all state and governing body graduation requirements 13 and earns a proficient score on the proficiency confirmation tool used to assess the 14 student during grade 12, demonstrating proficiency in all subject areas. The district 15 shall reassess a student who does not demonstrate proficiency at the student's request. 16 * Sec. 4. AS 14.03 is amended by adding a new section to read: 17 Sec. 14.03.076. High school graduation requirements. (a) Each 18 superintendent shall develop and submit to the governing body for approval a plan 19 consisting of district high school graduation requirements. The plan must set out the 20 units of credit required for specific subject areas and must require a student to 21 complete 22 (1) at least 21 units of credit in a program that offers six credits a year 23 or 24 credits in a program that offers seven credits a year; 24 (2) four units of credit in language arts; 25 (3) four units of credit in social studies, which must include one unit of 26 credit in the history of the United States, one-half unit of credit in state history, one- 27 half unit of credit in civics, and one-half unit of credit in economics; 28 (4) four units of credit in mathematics; 29 (5) three units of credit in science; and 30 (6) one unit of credit in health and physical education. 31 (b) A student who transfers into a district after earning at least 13 units of 01 credit from a school outside of the district may be excused from the district's subject 02 area requirements, at the discretion of the district. 03 (c) In this section, "unit of credit" means a credit awarded to a student for 04 achieving a passing grade in a course of study by meeting the content standards for the 05 course of study as prescribed by a local school board. 06 * Sec. 5. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 07 read: 08 APPLICABILITY. The provisions of AS 14.03.075(i), enacted by sec. 3 of this Act, 09 and the graduation requirements set out in AS 14.03.076(a), enacted by sec. 4 of this Act, 10 apply to students graduating from high school on or after January 1, 2030. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.